California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(7) If the victim cannot provide additional evidence of abuse, then the sworn statement shall be sufficient if the county makes a determination documented in writing in the case file that the applicant is credible.

(c) (1) To the extent allowed by federal law, the income, resources, and deductible expenses of those persons described in subdivision (b) shall be excluded when calculating CalFresh benefits under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900).

(2) No household shall receive more CalFresh benefits under this section than it would if no household member was rendered ineligible pursuant to Title IV of Public Law 104-193 and any subsequent amendments thereto.

(d) This section shall become
 inoperative on the date that the department has notified the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 18930, as added by the act that added this subdivision, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 86.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date.    See later operative version added by Sec. 87 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

18930.

(a) There is hereby created the California Food Assistance Program (CFAP).

(b) CFAP shall utilize existing CalFresh and electronic benefits transfer system infrastructure to the extent permissible by federal law.

(c) The State Department of Social Services shall use state funds appropriated for CFAP to provide nutrition benefits to households that are ineligible for CalFresh benefits solely due to their immigration status. In accordance with Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code, this chapter provides benefits for undocumented persons.

(1) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for the express purpose of
 this paragraph, an individual 55 years of age or older shall be eligible for the program established in subdivision (a) if the individual’s immigration status is the sole basis for their ineligibility for CalFresh benefits.

(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) and Section 18930.5, noncitizens of the United States shall be eligible for the program established pursuant to subdivision (a) if the person’s immigration status meets the eligibility criteria of the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program in effect on August 21, 1996, but the person is not eligible for federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits solely due to the person’s immigration status under Public Law 104-193 and any subsequent amendments thereto.

(3) Noncitizens of the United States shall be eligible for the program established pursuant to subdivision (a) if the person is a
 battered immigrant spouse or child or the parent or child of the battered immigrant, as described in Section 1641(c) of Title 8 of the United States Code, as amended by Section 5571 of Public Law 105-33, or if the person is a Cuban or Haitian entrant as described in Section 501(e) of the federal Refugee Education Assistance Act of 1980 (Public Law 96-422).

(4) An applicant who is otherwise eligible for the program but who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, shall be eligible for aid under this chapter if the applicant is sponsored and one of the following apply:

(A) The sponsor has died.

(B) The sponsor is disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(C) The applicant, after entry
 into the United States, is a victim of abuse by the sponsor or the spouse of the sponsor if the spouse is living with the sponsor.

(5) An applicant who is otherwise eligible for the program but who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, who does not meet one of the conditions of paragraph (4), shall be eligible for aid under this chapter beginning on October 1, 1999.

(6) The applicant shall be required to provide verification that one of the conditions of subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (4) has been met.

(7) For purposes of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4), abuse shall be defined in the same manner as provided in Section 11495.1 and Section 11495.12. A sworn statement of abuse by a victim, or the representative of the victim if the victim is not able to competently swear, shall be
 sufficient to establish abuse if one or more additional items of evidence of abuse are also provided. Additional evidence may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Police, government agency, or court records or files.

(B) Documentation from a domestic violence program, legal, clinical, medical, or other professional from whom the applicant or recipient has sought assistance in dealing with abuse.

(C) A statement from any other individual with knowledge of the circumstances that provided the basis for the claim.

(D) Physical evidence of abuse.

(8) If the victim cannot provide additional evidence of abuse, then the sworn statement shall be sufficient if the county makes a
 determination documented in writing in the case file that the applicant is credible.

(d) (1) The amount of nutrition benefits provided to each CFAP household shall be identical to the amount that would otherwise be provided to a household eligible for CalFresh benefits.

(2) The benefit amount for a CFAP recipient who is an excluded member of a CalFresh household shall be limited to the amount that the recipient would have received as their share of a CalFresh household benefit, had they not been excluded due to their immigration status.

(3) To the extent permissible under federal law, the delivery of CFAP nutrition benefits shall be identical to the delivery of CalFresh benefits to eligible CalFresh households.

(e) (1) To the extent allowed by federal law, the income, resources, and deductible expenses of those persons described in subdivision (c) shall be excluded when calculating CalFresh benefits under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900).

(2) No household shall receive more CalFresh benefits under this section than it would if no household member was rendered ineligible pursuant to Title IV of Public Law 104-193 and any subsequent amendments thereto.

(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions without taking regulatory action until final regulations are adopted, but no later than 18 months after
 the date upon which this subdivision becomes operative.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Section 18933 and subdivision (d), commencing October 1, 2027, or once this section becomes operative pursuant to subdivision (h), whichever is later, CalFresh and CFAP overissuance claims arising out of the same error or intentional program violation recovered through minimum allotment reductions shall be recovered consecutively.

(2) For any household receiving both CalFresh and CFAP benefits that is subject to minimum allotment reductions for overissuance claims, the CalFresh overissuance claim shall be recovered as prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 18927 and Section 273.18 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations and shall occur prior to recovery of the CFAP overissuance claim.

(3) Recovery of the CFAP overissuance claim shall not commence until the entire CalFresh overissuance claim has been recovered.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, minimum allotment reduction means either of the following:

(A) The reduction of a household’s monthly allotment due to an overissuance claim is determined to be twenty dollars ($20) pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 18927.

(B) The reduction of a household’s monthly allotment due to an overissuance claim is determined to be at ten dollars ($10) pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 18927.

(h) This section shall become operative on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 84) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 35.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18930.5.

(a) A recipient of benefits under this chapter shall not be required to meet the work requirement under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, as specified in Section 2015(o) of Title 7 of the United States Code, any work registration requirements, or the requirements of Section 273.11(k) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) An applicant who states that they do not have a social security number shall not be required to present a social security number in order to receive benefits under this chapter.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social
 Services may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions without taking regulatory action until final regulations are adopted, which shall be no later than 18 months after the date upon which this subdivision becomes operative.

(d) This section shall become operative on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 18930 as added by Section 87 of Chapter 85 of the Statutes of 2021.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 85) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 59.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Conditionally operative on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18931.

Any person who is eligible for federally funded Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits, administered in California as CalFresh benefits, shall not be eligible for assistance under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 96.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18932.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the federal and state laws and regulations governing the federal Food Stamp Program shall also govern the program provided for under this chapter.

(b) Federal deeming rules and exemptions governing the federal Food Stamp Program shall also govern the program provided for under this chapter, except that for immigrants with affidavits of support under Section 1183a of Title 8 of the United States Code who do not meet exemptions from deeming, the period for deeming of a sponsor’s income and resources shall be three years from the date of the sponsor’s execution of the affidavit of support pursuant to Section 1183a of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, immigrants who are victims of abuse by their sponsor or sponsor’s spouse shall be exempt from deeming. Abuse shall be defined in the same manner as provided in Section 11495.1 and Section 11495.12. A sworn statement of abuse by a victim, or the representative of the victim if the victim is not able to competently swear, shall be sufficient to establish abuse if one or more additional items of evidence of abuse is also provided. Additional evidence may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Police, government agency, or court records or files.

(2) Documentation from a domestic violence program, or from a legal, clinical, medical, or other professional from whom the applicant or recipient has sought assistance in dealing with abuse.

(3) A statement from any other individual with knowledge of the circumstances that provided the basis for the claim.

(4) Physical evidence of abuse.

(5) If the victim cannot provide additional evidence of abuse, then the sworn statement shall be sufficient if the county makes a determination documented in writing in the case file that the applicant is credible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 147, Sec. 42.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18932.1.

(a) The state shall retain a portion of any collected overissuance claims on benefits issued under this chapter. The portion of the recovered overissuance claims retained by the state shall be the same percentage as the state and the United States Department of Agriculture would have retained, combined, if the overissuance claims had been collected under the CalFresh program. Any remaining portion of the recovered overissuance claims shall be distributed by the department to the counties based on the amount of the overissuance claims recovered by the counties.

(b) This section shall become operative upon Section 18930, as added by Section 87 of Chapter 85 of the Statutes of 2021, becoming operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 61.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Conditionally operative on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18933.

Benefits provided under this chapter shall be equivalent to the benefits provided under the federal Food Stamp Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 287, Sec. 1.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18934.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds in the Budget Act for the purpose of providing services under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 147, Sec. 42.5.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18935.

This chapter shall be implemented only during any period that federal benefits are provided under Section 1612(a) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 147, Sec. 42.6.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.2. Tribal Nutrition Assistance [18936. - 18936.]

18936.

(a) The Tribal Nutrition Assistance Program is hereby established, to be administered by the State Department of Social Services.

(b) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, the department shall, at its discretion, award grants to eligible tribes and tribal organizations for the purpose of addressing food insecurity and inequities within California.

(c) The department shall develop grant eligibility standards and grant rules regarding approved services and assistance in government-to-government consultation with tribes.

(d) The department shall begin awarding grants no later than July 1, 2023.

(e) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this chapter are exempt from the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement and administer this act without adopting regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 62.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.3. Cash Assistance Program for Aged, Blind, and Disabled Legal Immigrants [18937. - 18944.]

18937.

The State Department of Social Services shall establish and supervise a county- or county consortia-administered program to provide cash assistance to aged, blind, and disabled legal immigrants who are not citizens and who successfully complete an application process. No application shall be required of individuals described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 18944. The department shall conduct the evaluations of disability for the program. If the federal government agrees to administer the program, the department shall contract with the federal
 government for this purpose, and the county responsibilities shall be reduced by the duties and responsibilities undertaken by the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 38.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18938.

(a) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3), an individual, upon application, shall be eligible for the program established pursuant to Section 18937 if his or her immigration status meets the eligibility criteria of the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Program for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled (SSI/SSP) in effect on August 21, 1996, but he or she is not eligible for SSI/SSP benefits solely due to his or her immigration status under Title IV of Public Law 104-193 and any subsequent amendments thereto.

(2) An applicant who is otherwise eligible for the program, but who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, shall be eligible for aid under this chapter only if he or she is sponsored and one of the following conditions is met:

(A) The sponsor has died.

(B) The sponsor is disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(C) The applicant, after entry into the United States, is a victim of abuse by the sponsor or the spouse of the sponsor if the spouse is living with the sponsor.

(3) An applicant who is otherwise eligible for the program but who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, and who does not meet one of the
 conditions of paragraph (2) shall be eligible for aid under this chapter beginning on October 1, 1999.

(4) The applicant shall be required to provide verification that one of the conditions of subparagraphs (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (2) has been met.

(5) (A) For purposes of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2), abuse shall be defined in the same manner as provided in Section 11495.1 and Section 11495.12. A sworn statement of abuse by a victim, or the representative of the victim if the victim is not able to competently swear, shall be sufficient to establish abuse if one or more additional items of evidence of abuse is also provided. Additional evidence may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) Police, government agency, or court records or files.

(ii) Documentation from a domestic violence program, legal, clinical, medical, or other professional from whom the applicant or recipient has sought assistance in dealing with abuse.

(iii) A statement from any other individual with knowledge of the circumstances that provided the basis for the claim.

(iv) Physical evidence of abuse.

(B) If the victim cannot provide additional evidence of abuse, then the sworn statement shall be sufficient if the county makes a determination documented in the case file that the applicant is credible.

(b) The department shall periodically redetermine the eligibility of each individual.

(c) The
 department shall take all steps necessary to qualify any benefits paid under this section to be eligible for reimbursement as federal Interim Assistance including requiring a repayment agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 53.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18939.

(a) Any person who is found to be eligible for federally funded SSI by the department shall be required to apply for SSI benefits. An individual may continue to receive benefits under this article if he or she fully cooperates in the application and administrative appeal process of the Social Security
 Administration. An individual shall continue to be eligible to receive benefits under this article if he or she receives an unfavorable decision from the Social Security Administration.

(b) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall require counties with a base caseload of recipients of aid under this chapter of 70 or more to establish an advocacy program to assist applicants and recipients of aid under this chapter in the application process for the SSI program. The department shall encourage counties with a base caseload of recipients of aid under this chapter of 69 or less to establish a similar advocacy program. Counties may, at their option, contract to provide any or all of the required advocacy services.

(2) The department shall provide assistance to counties in their efforts to implement an SSI advocacy program (SSIAP) for applicants and
 recipients of aid under this chapter.

(c) The State Department of Social Services shall ensure that its Disability Evaluation Division (DED) expedites the disability evaluations for applicants and recipients of aid under this chapter by utilizing its existing case records sharing procedures to ensure that information from previous DED evaluations for the Medi-Cal program are shared expeditiously with the federal component of the division that is adjudicating the SSI disability application.

(d) The State Department of Social Services shall reimburse counties for legal fees incurred by attorneys or other authorized representatives during the appeals phase of the SSI application process only when the county demonstrates that the legal representative successfully secures approval of SSI benefits. The legal fees for each case shall not exceed twice the difference between the maximum
 monthly individual payment under this chapter and the maximum monthly SSP payment.

(e) The department shall report to the Legislature, by July 1, 2007, on the outcomes of county SSI advocacy programs, including the numbers of cases that transitioned to SSI and the amount of savings realized through the transfers.

(f) Subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, of this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 759, Sec. 37.   Effective September 30, 2008.   Subds. (b) to (e) are inoperative July 1, 2011, by subd. (f).)
-------------------------------------------

18939.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who naturalizes while receiving benefits under this article, who remains otherwise eligible for benefits under this article, and who applies for federally funded Supplemental Security Income (SSI) and fully cooperates in the application and administrative appeal process of the Social Security Administration, shall continue to receive benefits under this article until the individual receives SSI benefits or has exhausted all appeals for their initial federal SSI application. A recipient shall not be entitled
 to receive duplicate payments for any month.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 177, Sec. 40.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18940.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the federal and state laws and regulations governing the SSI/SSP program shall also govern the program provided for under this chapter.

(b) Federal deeming rules and exemptions governing the SSI/SSP program, including all federal and state laws and regulations designed to protect SSI/SSP recipients and their resources, shall also govern the program provided for under this chapter, except that for immigrants described in paragraph
 (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 18938 who do not meet exemptions from deeming, the period for deeming of a sponsor’s income and resources shall be 10 years from the date of the sponsor’s execution of the affidavit of support or the date of the immigrant’s arrival in the United States, whichever is later.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, immigrants who are victims of abuse by their sponsor or sponsor’s spouse shall be exempt from deeming. Abuse shall be defined in the same manner as provided in Section 11495.1 and Section 11495.12. A sworn statement of abuse by a victim, or the representative of the victim if the victim is not able to competently swear, shall be sufficient to establish abuse if one or more additional items of evidence of abuse is also provided. Additional evidence may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Police, government
 agency, or court records or files.

(2) Documentation from a domestic violence program, or from a legal, clinical, medical, or other professional from whom the applicant or recipient has sought assistance in dealing with abuse.

(3) A statement from any other individual with knowledge of the circumstances that provided the basis for the claim.

(4) Physical evidence of abuse.

(5) If the victim cannot provide additional evidence of abuse, then the sworn statement shall be sufficient if the county makes a determination documented in writing in the case file that the applicant is credible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 54.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18941.

Benefits provided under this chapter shall be equivalent to the benefits provided under the SSI/SSP program, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3. The benefit amount implemented by the act that added this section shall be retroactive to June 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 123.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18942.

The department shall reimburse the counties for the cost of actual payments made pursuant to this chapter and for the administrative costs actually attributable to those payments. Any appropriation for this chapter may be transferred to pay for the costs of a contract entered into with the federal government to administer this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 38.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18943.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, through June 30, 1999, the State Department of Social Services may implement the applicable provisions of this chapter through all county letter or similar instructions from the director.

(b) The director shall adopt regulations, as otherwise necessary, to implement the applicable provisions of this chapter no
 later than July 1, 1999. Emergency regulations to implement the applicable provisions of this chapter may be adopted by the director in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(c) Emergency regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 38.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18944.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds in the Budget Act for the purpose of providing services under this chapter.

(b) This chapter shall become operative on:

(1) October 1, 1998, for those individuals who are eligible for aid under this chapter and are discontinued from the SSI/SSP program effective with their September 1998 benefits as a result of their immigration status under Title IV of
 Public Law 104-193 and any subsequent amendments thereto. Until the counties begin full operation the department shall cause a payment to each individual or couple to be issued through the Controller so that there is no interruption in these individual’s receipt of aid to which they are eligible under this chapter.

(2) November 1, 1998, for applicants for this program to have their applications accepted by county welfare departments, and establish a beginning date of aid. Counties shall have the ability to make eligibility determinations and cause the issuance of payments no later than December 1, 1998, unless the federal government has agreed to provide the services under this chapter at an earlier date.

(c) This chapter shall be implemented only during any period that federal benefits are provided under Section 1612(a) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 147, Sec. 43.5.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.4. Services and Benefits for Noncitizen Victims of Trafficking, Domestic Violence, and Other Serious Crimes [18945. - 18945.]

18945.

(a) Noncitizen victims of trafficking, domestic violence, and other serious crimes, as defined in subdivision (b), shall be eligible for public social services under this division, and health care services under Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, to the same extent as individuals who are admitted to the United States as refugees under Section 1157 of Title 8 of the United States Code. These services shall discontinue if there is a final administrative denial of a visa application under Section 1101(a)(15)(T)(i) or (ii), or Section 1101(a)(15)(U)(i) or (ii), of Title 8 of the United States Code. For trafficking victims on behalf of whom law enforcement officials have not yet filed for continued presence or who have not yet filed an application for a visa, benefits issued pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for up to one year, and shall continue after that date only if an application for continued presence, or an application for a visa, is filed within the one-year period. Benefits and services under this subdivision shall be paid from state funds to the extent federal funding is unavailable.

(b) For purposes of this section, victims of trafficking, domestic violence, and other serious crimes shall be defined to include both of the following:

(1) Noncitizen victims of a severe form of trafficking in persons, who have been subjected to an act or practice described in Section 7102(8) or (9) of Title 22 of the United States Code or Section 236.1 of the Penal Code, and who have filed an I-914 application for T Nonimmigrant status with the appropriate federal agency, are preparing to file an application for status under Section 1101(a)(15)(T)(i) or (ii) of Title 8 of the United States Code, or otherwise are taking steps to meet the conditions for federal benefits eligibility under Section 7105 of Title 22 of the United States Code.

(2) Individuals who have filed a formal application with the appropriate federal agency for status under Section 1101(a)(15)(U)(i) or (ii) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(c) After one year from the date of application for public social services, noncitizen victims of a severe form of trafficking, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), shall be ineligible for state-funded services if a visa application has not been filed until under Section 1101(a)(15)(T)(i) or (ii) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(d) A noncitizen victim of a severe form of trafficking, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), who is issued a visa shall be removed from the state-funded program and provided federally funded public social services benefits under the provisions of Section 1522 of Title 8 of the United States Code, or another federal program for which the noncitizen victim may be eligible.

(e) For purposes of this section, Section 13283 and Section 14005.2:

(1) In determining whether an applicant for public social services has been a victim of a severe form of human trafficking, as defined in Section 7102(8) or (9) of Title 22 of the United States Code, or Section 236.1 of the Penal Code, the state or local agency shall consider all relevant and credible evidence. A sworn statement by a victim, or a representative if the victim is not able to competently swear, shall be sufficient if at least one item of additional evidence is also provided, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Police, government agency, or court records or files.

(B) News articles.

(C) Documentation from a social services, trafficking, or domestic violence program, or a legal, clinical, medical, or other professional from whom the applicant or recipient has sought assistance in dealing with the crime.

(D) A statement from any other individual with knowledge of the circumstances that provided the basis for the claim.

(E) Physical evidence.

(F) A copy of a completed visa application.

(G) Written notice from the federal agency of receipt of the visa application.

(2) If the victim cannot provide additional evidence, then the sworn statement shall be sufficient if the county or state agency makes a determination documented in the case file that the applicant is credible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 258.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. The Office of Child Abuse Prevention [18950. - 18973.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [18950. - 18950.5.]

18950.

The Legislature finds and declares that child abuse is a growing concern in this state, and that current methods of coping with child abuse problems are resulting in family breakups that are both expensive and nonproductive to the state. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for the establishment of a State Office of Child Abuse Prevention to plan, improve, develop, and carry out programs and activities relating to the prevention, identification and treatment of child abuse and neglect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 756, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18950.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Current mandatory reporting laws have resulted in a significant increase in the number of reports made with no corresponding evidence that children are safer.

(2) The harm and trauma of unnecessary reporting falls disproportionately on Black/African American and Native American/Indigenous children and families.

(3) Therefore, to eliminate the disproportionate surveillance and reporting of Black/African American, Native American/Indigenous, and Latino families and communities, thereby leading to an environment of antiracism in support of all children
 and families, it is the intent of the Legislature that training be fully implemented regarding the definition of general neglect, as defined in Section 11165.2 of the Penal Code, and that investigations of general neglect by child welfare agencies as referred by mandated reporters emphasize community-based supports and family preservation services to reduce disparities and disproportionality in the child welfare system.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to clarify statutes to allow for the sharing of information across agencies through a multidisciplinary team approach to serve children and families to prevent foster care entry.

(b) The department, through the State Office of Child Abuse Prevention, with participation of individuals with lived expertise, county child welfare agencies, and other stakeholders, shall, by no later than July 1, 2027, develop
 a standardized curriculum for mandated reporters. The curriculum shall reflect the intent of the Legislature in subdivision (a) and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) History of mandated reporting laws, including the impact of structural racism resulting in a disproportionate number of Black and Indigenous families involved in the child welfare services system.

(2) The Federal Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act.

(3) California’s Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act in Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(4) The federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(5) Best
 practice for defining “reasonable suspicion” and “substantial risk.”

(6) Differences between “severe neglect” and “general neglect” as defined in Section 11165.2 of the Penal Code.

(7) California child abuse, neglect, and disproportionality data.

(8) Definitions of “bias,” including “implicit,” and “explicit,” bias, and “trauma,” the impact of bias and trauma on families and children, and strategies for recognizing and mitigating their impact.

(9) The impact on families of making a child abuse or neglect report to child protective services.

(10) Considerations for special populations, including individuals with disabilities, behavioral health, domestic violence, and substance use concerns,
 as well as the unique factors involved in supporting children 0 to 5 years of age.

(11) Decisionmaking processes and tools for mandated reporters, including case examples of general neglect and severe neglect as those terms are defined in Section 11165.2 of the Penal Code.

(12) Education and information on community resources, community-based organizations, and other government agencies that can provide support to families in need, including information about basic aid programs like the CalWORKs, Medi-Cal and CalFresh programs.

(c) (1) The department shall make the training described in this section available on an internet website.

(2) The department may contract for the development, maintenance, and online hosting of the training
 described in this section.

(3) The department may charge an appropriate fee to offset the cost of generating individual completion certificates for the training described in this section and maintaining a verification system for such certificates. This paragraph shall not apply to any other child abuse mandated reporter training the department is otherwise required by law to provide free of cost, including the child abuse mandated reporter training described in Section 1596.8662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended by the department for purposes of this section, including, but not limited to, developing and providing mandated reporter training and education, improving mandated reporter policies, practices, and public awareness, and strengthening pathways to community supports, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing
 with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an employer having one or more mandated reporters, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code, shall strongly encourage completion of training by their mandated reporters using the curriculum set forth in subdivision (b) within the first three months of their employment, or on or before March 1, 2030, whichever is later.

(2) The training under this subdivision shall not apply to either
 of the following:

(A) A volunteer whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of children, as described in subdivision (g) of Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code.

(B) A mandated reporter listed in Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code who is otherwise required by law to receive training in child abuse and neglect identification and reporting.

(e) For the purposes of this chapter, “California child abuse, neglect, and disproportionality data” means data documented by the California Child Welfare Indicators Project.
